Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 2 Superior Court

8-2-1.
Composition.

There shall be a superior court which shall consist of a presiding justice and twenty-one (21) associate justices.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 1913, ch. 906, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2157, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1554, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2254, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-1

; P.L. 1968, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 85, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 252, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 404, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 24, § 7; P.L. 1993, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 23, § 1.

8-2-1.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 404, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 24, § 7; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 65, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1993, ch. 99, § 2, effective July 14, 1993.

8-2-1.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 358, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 23, § 2, effective July 1, 1995.

8-2-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 2; P.L. 1930, ch. 1504, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2254, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-2

; P.L. 1977, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 97, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1994, ch. 42, § 3, effective June 2, 1994.

8-2-3.
Time and place of holding court.

A superior court shall be held at such times and places as shall be appointed by law, by such of the justices thereof as shall be designated from time to time by the presiding justice.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-3

.

8-2-4.
Presiding justice as administrative judge.

The presiding justice of the superior court shall be the administrative judge. He or she shall be the administrative head of the superior court and have supervision and control of the calendars and of the assignment of justices. All court stenographers and secretaries shall be under his or her supervision. It shall be his or her duty to gather such statistics as shall reflect accurately the work of the court for the information of the court and such other use as he or she may deem expedient.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 496, § 3, as enacted by P.L. 1952, ch. 3030, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-4

; P.L. 1968, ch. 179, § 1.

8-2-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 496, § 3, as enacted by P.L. 1952, ch. 3030, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-5

); Repealed by P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 5.

8-2-6.
Recommendations by administrative judge to chief justice.

The administrative judge shall also be charged with the general responsibility for making any recommendations to the chief justice that he or she may believe important concerning the work of the superior court or any officers in any way connected therewith.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 496, § 3, as enacted by P.L. 1952, ch. 3030, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-6

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 3.

8-2-7.
Information requests by administrative judge.

The judges of the superior court shall comply with all requests made by the administrative judge for information and statistical data bearing on the state of the dockets of the court and such other information as may reflect the business, and the state of business, transacted by them.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938 ch. 496, § 27; P.L. 1952, ch. 3030, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-7

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 3.

8-2-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1233, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-8

; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 222, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 377, § 4, effective June 28, 2002.

8-2-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1233, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-9

; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 222, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 377, § 4, effective June 28, 2002.

8-2-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1233, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-10

; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 222, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 377, § 4, effective June 28, 2002.

8-2-11.
Administrative clerk.

There shall be an administrative clerk in the superior court, who shall be appointed by the presiding justice in his or her capacity as administrative judge and who shall hold office at the pleasure of the administrative judge. The clerk shall perform such duties and attend to such matters as may be assigned to him or her by the administrative judge.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 26; P.L. 1952, ch. 3030, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-11

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 3.

8-2-11.1.
Administrator/magistrate.

Any person holding the position of administrative clerk in the superior court who is a member of the bar of Rhode Island may be appointed administrator/magistrate for a term of ten (10) years and until a successor is appointed and qualified, by the presiding justice, with the advice and consent of the senate, in his or her capacity as administrative judge. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the assignment of an administrator/magistrate to more than one such term, subject to the advice and consent of the senate. Any magistrate in service as of January 1, 2008 who serves at the pleasure of the presiding justice of the superior court may be appointed for a term of ten (10) years with the advice and consent of the senate and until a successor is appointed and qualified.

The administrator/magistrate shall have the power to hear and determine such matters as may be assigned to the administrator/magistrate by the presiding justice all to the same effect as if done by a justice of the superior court.

Without limiting the generality of the foregoing powers and authority, the administrator/magistrate is authorized and empowered to hear and determine motions in civil and criminal proceedings, formal and special causes, to conduct arraignments, to grant or deny bail, to accept pleas of not guilty, guilty, or nolo contendere, and to impose sentence on a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, all to the same effect as if done by a justice of the superior court.

The administrator/magistrate may be authorized:

To regulate all proceedings before him or her;

To do all acts and take all measures necessary or proper for the efficient performance of his or her duties;

To require the production before him or her of books, papers, vouchers, documents, and writings;

To rule upon the admissibility of evidence;

To issue subpoenas for the appearance of witnesses, to put witnesses on oath, to examine them, and to call parties to the proceeding and examine them upon oath;

To adjudicate a person in contempt and to order him or her imprisoned for not more than seventy-two (72) hours, pending review by a justice of the court, for failure to appear in response to a summons or for refusal to answer questions or produce evidence or for behavior disrupting a proceeding;

To adjudicate a party in contempt and to order him or her imprisoned for not more than seventy-two (72) hours, pending review by a justice of the court, for failure to comply with a pending order to provide payment or to perform any other act; and

To issue a capias and/or body attachment upon the failure of a party or witness to appear after having been properly served and, should the court not be in session, the person apprehended may be detained at the adult correctional institution, if an adult, or at the Rhode Island training school for youth, if a child, until the next session of the court.

A party aggrieved by an order entered by the administrator/magistrate shall be entitled to a review of the order by a justice of the superior court. Unless otherwise provided in the rules of procedure of the court, the review shall be on the record and appellate in nature. The court shall, by rules of procedure, establish procedures for review of orders entered by the administrator/magistrate, and for enforcement of contempt adjudications of the administrator/magistrate.

Final orders of the superior court entered in a proceeding to review an order of the administrator/magistrate may be appealed to the supreme court.

The administrator/magistrate shall be:

Governed by the commission on judicial tenure and discipline, chapter 16, of this title, in the same manner as justices and judges;

Subject to all provisions of the canons of judicial ethics;

Subject to all criminal laws relative to judges by virtue of §§

11-7-1

and

11-7-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 73, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 3, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 1.

8-2-12.
Seal of superior court.

The superior court shall have a seal in each of the counties of Providence, Newport, Kent, and Washington, which shall contain the words “SUPERIOR COURT OF THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND”, with the name of the county in which the seal belongs, and also such device as the justices of the court, or a majority of them, shall adopt.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 36; G.L. 1909, ch. 274, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 324, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 497, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-12

; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 2, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 2, effective June 23, 2021.

8-2-13.
Exclusive jurisdiction of equity actions.

The superior court shall, except as otherwise provided by law, have exclusive original jurisdiction of suits and proceedings of an equitable character and of statutory proceedings following the course of equity; provided, however, that every probate court shall have the power, concurrent with the superior court, to replace, remove, or fill any vacancy of any trustee under a trust established under a will, or to effect tax minimization or estate planning under §

33-15-37.1

. If an action is brought in the superior court which represents an attempt in good faith to invoke the jurisdiction conferred by this section, the superior court shall have jurisdiction of all other actions arising out of the same transaction or occurrence, provided the other actions are joined with the action so brought or are subsequently made a part thereof under applicable procedural rules, and the court may retain jurisdiction over the other actions even though the initial action fails for want of equity jurisdiction.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-13

; P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 2; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 2.

8-2-13.1.
Retaining equity jurisdiction during arbitration.

Notwithstanding the existence of any agreement providing for the resolution of disputes, contract violations, or grievances by way of arbitration or other statutory means, the superior court shall have equity jurisdiction to issue temporary restraining orders and injunctions to maintain the status quo as it existed prior to the action which is the subject matter of the dispute pending resolution of the matter through arbitration and/or statutory means. The court’s decision to grant or not to grant a temporary restraining order and/or injunction shall not be considered by the arbitrator in resolving the dispute.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 487, § 1.

8-2-14.
Jurisdiction of actions at law.

The superior court shall have original jurisdiction of all actions at law where title to real estate or some right or interest therein is in issue, except actions for possession of tenements let or held at will or by sufferance; and shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of all other actions at law in which the amount in controversy shall exceed the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000); and shall also have concurrent original jurisdiction with the district court in all other actions at law in which the amount in controversy exceeds the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) and does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000); provided, that the plaintiff shall not recover costs unless he or she shall recover in such action not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or unless the action is one in which the title to real estate or some right or interest therein is in question, or unless in the discretion of the court, on motion, costs are awarded. If an action is brought in the superior court which is within the jurisdiction conferred by this section, the superior court shall have jurisdiction of all other actions arising out of the same transaction or occurrence, provided the other actions are joined with the action within the jurisdiction conferred by this section or are subsequently made a part thereof under applicable procedural rules.

The superior court shall also have concurrent original jurisdiction, with the probate courts, of the change of names of those persons eighteen (18) years of age or older who have been convicted of any misdemeanor or felony.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 7; P.L. 1929, ch. 1331, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-14

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 326, § 2.

8-2-15.
Criminal jurisdiction.

The superior court shall have original jurisdiction of all crimes, offenses, and misdemeanors, except as otherwise provided by law, and shall sentence all persons found guilty before it to the punishment prescribed by law. All indictments found by grand juries shall be returned into the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-15

.

8-2-15.1.
Gun court calendar.

Findings and declarations. The General Assembly finds that:

There has been significant growth in the use of firearms in the commission of violent crimes.

Many of the shootings are drug or gang related and endanger law abiding citizens.

Many of the gun offenses are committed while individuals are free on bail for other offenses.

The growing number of gun related offenses constitutes a burden upon the state of Rhode Island and threatens the domestic tranquility of the state and its people, especially residents of the urban areas where these crimes are most prevalent.

In order to deter the use of firearms in the commission of violent crime, and to protect the law abiding public, there must be swift disposition of gun related offenses in our courts, and there must be the certain prospect of prison terms for those who are convicted of such crimes.

Declaration of policy. It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state of Rhode Island to provide maximum safety and security to its people from unlawful gun related violence and intrusion upon their persons and property by expediting the processing and disposition of such cases and, unless otherwise provided, imposing prison terms that must be served.

Establishment. To accomplish this purpose in an effort to minimize delay in the processing of criminal cases in the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol relating to the illegal possession and use of guns and other dangerous weapons, there shall be established a separate calendar within the jurisdiction of the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol for hearing trial and disposition of actions brought pursuant to §§

11-47-3

,

11-47-5

,

11-47-5.1

,

11-47-8

,

11-47-24

,

12-13-1.2

, and

12-19-21

.

Gun court calendar.

The presiding justice of the superior court shall create a gun court calendar in the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol and shall assign personnel to the extent warranted to exclusively hear and decide all criminal actions involving offenses committed in Providence and Bristol counties and brought pursuant to violations of the provisions of §§

11-47-5

,

11-47-5.1

,

11-47-8

, and

11-47-24

set forth in subsection (c), and it shall be referred to as the “gun court calendar” of the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol.

The “gun court calendar” of the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol shall also have concurrent jurisdiction with any other calendar of the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol to hear and decide all criminal actions involving offenses brought pursuant to violations of the provisions of §§

11-47-3

,

12-13-1.2

, and

12-19-21

, so long as the criminal action involves the possession, threatened use, or use of a firearm.

Time for trial. All trials in the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol involving offenses brought pursuant to the sections as set forth in subsection (c) shall be scheduled for trial on the “gun court calendar” in the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol within sixty (60) days of the completion of discovery. No continuances or postponements shall be granted except for good cause shown. Such continuances as are necessary shall be granted for the shortest practicable time.

Use of section. Under no circumstances shall the defendant(s) be permitted to use this section as a basis for a dismissal of an action, as this section is enacted for the benefit and convenience of the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol in the assignment of its actions for trial.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 267, § 1.

8-2-16.
Jurisdiction of motions for new trial and extraordinary writs.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction of such motions for new trials as may be provided by law, and concurrently with the supreme court shall have jurisdiction of writs of habeas corpus, mandamus, quo warranto, and informations in the nature of quo warranto.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-16

.

8-2-17.
Jurisdiction of appeals, statutory proceedings, and probate matters.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction of such appeals and statutory proceedings as may be provided by law, and may exercise general probate jurisdiction in all cases brought before it on appeal from probate courts, or when such jurisdiction is properly involved in suits in equity.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-17

.

8-2-18 — 8-2-22.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 26; P.L. 1935, ch. 2254, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 25; Repealed by P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 20.

8-2-23.
One justice quorum — Two or more sitting together.

Any one justice of the superior court shall be a quorum for all purposes, except as otherwise provided; but the court may, when so ordered by the presiding justice, be held for any purpose by two (2) or more justices, to be designated as provided in §

8-2-4

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-23

.

8-2-24.
Simultaneous sessions.

Superior courts may be held, with or without juries, by different justices at the same time and in different places in the same county or in different counties.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-24

.

8-2-25.
Powers of supreme court justice in vacation.

Any justice of the supreme court may exercise in the vacation of the superior court all the powers which may be exercised during such time by a justice of the superior court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-25

.

8-2-26.
Power of justice after retirement, resignation, or elevation.

Whenever any justice of the superior court shall cease to be a justice thereof by reason of elevation to the supreme court, resignation, or retirement, he or she shall have the power to exercise the function of a justice of the superior court for the purpose of rendering a decision or completing any matter pending before him or her as justice of the superior court at the time of the elevation, resignation, or retirement. The provisions of this section shall be interpreted and construed liberally, for the purpose of accomplishing the purpose thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 324, § 10; P.L. 1935, ch. 2208, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 497, §§ 10, 11; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-26

.

8-2-27.
Venue — Consolidation of actions.

Any civil cause or any question of law or fact therein may, by consent of the parties and with approval of the court, be tried and determined in any county. When civil actions involving a common question of law or fact are pending in different counties, the court may in the interest of convenience order any such action transferred to another county for the purpose of consolidating the actions for trial.

Any civil cause may be referred from one county to another by the presiding justice of the court in the interest of obtaining a more speedy trial.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-27

; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 2; P.L. 1968, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 1.

8-2-28.
Transfer of papers between counties.

The superior court may order the papers in any cause to be sent from one county to another; and in matters heard in any county other than that in which the cause was entered, the court shall certify the proceedings to the clerk of the court in the county in which the cause was entered, and shall send to the clerk all the papers therein to be kept on file in his or her office and there recorded.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-28

.

8-2-29.
Grounds for change of venue.

Whenever it shall be made to appear to the satisfaction of the superior court, as provided in §

8-2-30

, by either party to any civil action, suit, or proceeding now or hereafter pending therein, that by reason of local prejudice or other cause the parties to the action or proceeding, or either of them, cannot have a full, fair, and impartial trial in the court for the county where the action shall have been commenced or shall be pending, the court shall order the cause to be removed for trial to such other county as shall be deemed most fair and equitable for the parties.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 24; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-29

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 6.

8-2-30.
Petition for change of venue.

Applications for the removal of any civil action, suit, or proceeding, as provided in §

8-2-29

, shall be by petition setting forth the cause or reasons therefor, which petition shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court for the county where the action, suit, or proceeding is pending, and a copy thereof served on the adverse party, or on his or her attorney of record, within ten (10) days after the filing of the petition; and no such petition in any civil cause shall be heard until the expiration of five (5) days after the service of the copy, unless by agreement of the parties.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 25; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 22; P.L. 1928, ch. 1205, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-30

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 1.

8-2-31.
Order for change of venue.

If, upon hearing the petition and the evidence thereon, the court shall be of opinion that a full, fair, and impartial trial cannot be had in the court for the county where the cause shall have been commenced or is pending, the court shall make an order of removal, directing the clerk of the court where the cause is pending to transmit the record thereof to the clerk of the court for the county named in the order of removal, to which county the cause shall be removed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 26; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-31

.

8-2-32.
Retention of papers or return to original county.

If an entire cause shall have been removed under the provisions of this chapter, all further proceedings in the cause shall be taken as if the cause had been commenced in the county to which it was removed. If less than the entire cause shall have been removed, then upon determination of the question for which removal was made, the record shall be remitted to the clerk of the court for the county from which the cause was removed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-32

; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 2.

8-2-33.
Territorial extent of powers of justices.

Any justice of the superior court may order special service of any process, original or auxiliary, in any proceeding within the jurisdiction of the court, by personal notice, notice by mail, or publication in a newspaper within or without the state, for the purpose of dealing with any property, relation, or person within the state or otherwise subject to the jurisdiction of the court, and may make orders, decrees, and judgments in one county in cases pending in any other county, which orders and decrees and judgments shall be transmitted to the clerk of the court for the other county.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-33

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 1.

8-2-34.
Impaneling and instruction of grand juries.

All grand juries shall be impaneled by the superior court. They shall be empowered, required, and charged to diligently inquire and make true presentment of all crimes and offenses done or committed within their jurisdiction, and shall, insofar as may be deemed necessary, be instructed by the court in the law relative thereto.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-34

.

Form of Complaint.

Indictment for violation of P.L. 1896, ch. 334, § 2 need not show that complaint was made by secretary of state board of agriculture, as provided in § 3, as the grand jury under common law powers and under this section had full power to find such indictment. State v. Snell,

21 R.I. 232

, 42 A. 869,

1899 R.I. LEXIS 20

(1899).

8-2-35.
Arraignment of persons presented — Warrants on indictments or information.

The superior court may arraign all persons presented by a grand jury or charged by information filed by the attorney general, and may require such persons to plead to the indictment against them, if in custody, or if taken while the court is in session; and if not in custody, or taken while the court is in session, may issue warrants on the indictment or information.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-35

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 1.

8-2-36.
Admission to bail.

The superior court may admit to bail all persons brought before it for any offense whatsoever.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-36

.

8-2-37.
Requiring recognizance of criminal complainants.

The superior court may require the complainant in any criminal pleading pending therein to give recognizance with sufficient surety to prosecute his or her complaint, with effect, and in default thereof the court may dismiss the complaint.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-37

.

8-2-38.
Instructions to jury.

In every case, civil and criminal, tried in the superior court with a jury, the justice presiding shall instruct the jury in the law relating to the action, and may sum up the evidence therein to the jury whenever he or she may deem it advisable so to do; but any material misstatement of the testimony by him or her may be excepted to by the party aggrieved.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 23; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

8-2-38

.

8-2-39.
General magistrate — Appointment, duties and powers.

There is hereby created within the superior court the position of general magistrate who shall be appointed by the presiding justice of the superior court, with the advice and consent of the senate, for a term of ten (10) years and until a successor is appointed and qualified. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the assignment of the general magistrate to more than one such term, subject to the advice and consent of the senate. The person appointed to serve as general magistrate shall be a member of the bar of Rhode Island. The powers and duties of the general magistrate shall be prescribed in the order appointing him or her.

The general magistrate shall assist the court in:

The determination of, monitoring, collection, and payment of restitution and court ordered fines, fees, and costs or the ordering of community service in lieu of or in addition to the payment of restitution, fines, fees, and costs, consistent with other provisions of the general laws;

The determination and payment of claims under the violent crimes indemnity fund for the Criminal Injuries Compensation Act of 1972, chapter 25 of title 12;

The determination and payment of claims from the Criminal Royalties Distribution Act of 1983, chapter 25.1 of title 12; and

Such other matters as the presiding justice of the superior court determines are necessary.

The chief justice of the supreme court, with the consent of the presiding justice and, if applicable, the chief judge of a particular court, may assign the general magistrate to serve as a magistrate in any court of the unified system. When the general magistrate is so assigned he or she shall be vested, authorized, and empowered with all the powers belonging to the magistrate position to which he or she is specially assigned.

The general magistrate will be empowered to hear all motions, pretrial conferences, arraignments, probable cause hearings, bail hearings, bail and probation revocation hearings, and to review all such matters including, but not limited to the above, and to modify the terms and conditions of probation and other court-ordered monetary payments including, but not limited to, the extension of time for probation and court-ordered monetary payments as provided by law. The general magistrate shall have the power to take testimony in connection with all matters set forth herein.

The general magistrate may be authorized:

To regulate all proceedings before him or her;

To do all acts and take all measures necessary or proper for the efficient performance of his or her duties;

To require the production before him or her of books, papers, vouchers, documents, and writings;

To rule upon the admissibility of evidence;

To issue subpoenas for the appearance of witnesses, to put witnesses on oath, to examine them, and to call parties to the proceeding and examine them upon oath;

To adjudicate a person in contempt and to order him or her imprisoned for not more than seventy-two (72) hours, pending review by a justice of the relevant court, for failure to appear in response to a summons or for refusal to answer questions or produce evidence or for behavior disrupting a proceeding;

To adjudicate a party in contempt and to order him or her imprisoned for not more than seventy-two (72) hours, pending review by a justice of the relevant court, for failure to comply with a pending order to provide payment or to perform any other act; and

To issue a capias and/or body attachment upon the failure of a party or witness to appear after having been properly served and, should the court not be in session, the person apprehended may be detained at the adult correctional institutions, if an adult, or at the Rhode Island training school for youth, if a child, until the next session of the court.

A party aggrieved by an order entered by the general magistrate shall be entitled to a review of the order by a justice of the relevant court. Unless otherwise provided in the rules of procedure of the court, such review shall be on the record and appellate in nature. The court shall, by rules of procedure, establish procedures for review of orders entered by a general magistrate, and for enforcement of contempt adjudications of a general magistrate.

Final orders of the superior or family court entered in a proceeding to review an order of a general magistrate may be appealed to the supreme court. Final orders of the district court entered in a proceeding to review an order of the general magistrate may be appealed to the superior court.

The general magistrate shall:

Receive all credits and retirement allowances as afforded justices under chapter 3 of this title and any other applicable law, including without limitation, §

8-3-16

;

Receive a salary equivalent to that of a district court judge;

Be governed by the commission on judicial tenure and discipline, chapter 16, of this title, in the same manner as justices and judges;

Be subject to all provisions of the canons of judicial ethics or code of judicial conduct;

Be subject to all criminal laws relative to judges by virtue of §§

11-7-1

and

11-7-2

.

The provisions of this section shall be afforded liberal construction.

The presiding justice of the superior court shall initially appoint such support staff as may be necessary, relating to preparation, investigation, and implementation of the general magistrate’s functions. Effective November 15, 1993, the support staff shall be placed under the supervision and management of the superior court, and new appointments or personnel changes in the support staff shall be subject to the directions and approval of the superior court, consistent with any applicable collective bargaining agreements. The general magistrate shall have the power and authority to issue subpoenas and to compel the attendance of witnesses at any place within the state, to administer oaths and to require testimony under oath. The general magistrate, or his or her designee, may serve his or her process or notices in a manner provided for the service of process and notice in civil or criminal actions in accordance with the rules of court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 25, § 1; P.L.1991, ch. 44, art. 73, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 3, § 6; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 9.

8-2-39.1.
Special magistrate.

There is hereby created within the superior court the position of special magistrate, who shall be appointed by the presiding justice of the superior court, with the advice and consent of the senate, for a period of ten (10) years, and until a successor is appointed and qualified. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to prohibit the reappointment of a special magistrate for one or more additional ten (10) year terms, subject to the advice and consent of the senate. The person appointed to serve as special magistrate shall be a member of the bar of the state of Rhode Island. The special magistrate shall have the duties, responsibilities, powers and benefits as authorized in §

8-2-39

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 1, § 21; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 3, § 6.